Louisiana, session 2026, HB160.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:34.9(L)(1) and 35.3(L)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§34.9. Battery of a dating partner
* * *
L.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if the offense
involves strangulation, the offender, in addition to any other penalties imposed
pursuant to this Section, shall be imprisoned at hard labor for not more than three ten
years. At least one year of the sentence imposed shall be served without the benefit
of probation or suspension of sentence.
* * *
§35.3. Domestic abuse battery
* * *
L.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if the domestic
abuse battery involves strangulation, the offender, in addition to any other penalties
imposed pursuant to this Section, shall be imprisoned at hard labor for not more than
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 160 ENROLLED
three ten years. At least one year of the sentence imposed shall be served without
the benefit of probation or suspension of sentence.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.